Washington statutes.
RCW 41.32.042

Validity of deductions—Interest.

The deductions from salaries of members of the retirement system for their contributions to the system are not considered diminution of pay and every member is conclusively presumed to consent thereto as a condition of employment. All contributions to the member reserve shall be credited to the individual for whose account the deductions from salary were made. Regular interest shall be credited to each member's account at least annually.

[ 1992 c 212 s 9; 1982 1st ex.s. c 52 s 13; 1947 c 80 s 46; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 4995-65. Prior: 1941 c 97 s 5, part; 1939 c 86 s 5, part; 1937 c 221 s 6, part; Rem. Supp. 1941 s 4995-6, part. Formerly RCW 41.32.460.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—1982 1st ex.s. c 52: See note following RCW 2.10.180.